Louisiana, session 2026, HB328.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:95.2(C)(introductory paragraph) and (6) through (8) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§95.2. Carrying a firearm or dangerous weapon by a student or nonstudent on school
property, at school-sponsored functions, or in a firearm-free zone
* * *
C. The provisions of this Section shall do not apply to any of the following:
* * *
(6) Any student carrying a firearm to or from a class, in which he is duly
enrolled, that requires the use of the firearm in the class. However, such firearm
shall not be possessed in the dormitory room of that student.
(7) A student enrolled or participating in an activity requiring the use of a
firearm including but not limited to any ROTC function under the authorization of
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-919 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 328
a university. However, such firearm shall not be possessed in the dormitory room
of that student.
(8) A student who possesses a firearm in his dormitory room or while going
to or from his vehicle or any other person with permission of the administration.
* * *